Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 10.1. Utility Facilities Act.

§ 56-265.1.
Definitions.

In this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Company” means a corporation, a limited liability company, an individual, a partnership, an association, a joint-stock company, a business trust, a cooperative, or an organized group of persons, whether incorporated or not; or any receiver, trustee or
other liquidating agent of any of the foregoing in his capacity as such; but not a municipal corporation or a county, unless such municipal corporation or county has obtained a certificate pursuant to § 56-265.4:4.

“Public utility” means any company that owns or operates facilities within the Commonwealth of Virginia for the generation, transmission, or distribution of electric energy for sale, for the production, storage, transmission, or distribution, otherwise
than in enclosed portable containers, of natural gas, or, if produced, stored, transmitted, or distributed by a natural gas utility as defined in § 56-265.4:6, supplemental or substitute forms of gas sources as defined in § 56-248.1,
or geothermal resources for sale for heat, light or power, or for the furnishing of telephone service, sewerage facilities or water. A “public utility” may own a facility for the storage of electric energy for sale that includes
one or more pumped hydroelectricity generation and storage facilities located in the coalfield region of Virginia as described in §

15.2-6002

. However, the term “public utility” does not include any of the following:

Except as otherwise provided in § 56-265.3:1, any company furnishing sewerage facilities, geothermal resources or water to less than 50 customers. Any company furnishing water or sewer services to 10 or more customers and excluded by this subdivision
from the definition of “public utility” for purposes of this chapter nevertheless shall not abandon the water or sewer services unless and until approval is granted by the Commission or all the customers receiving such
services agree to accept ownership of the company.

Any company generating and distributing electric energy exclusively for its own consumption.

Any company (A) which furnishes electric service together with heating and cooling services, generated at a central plant installed on the premises to be served, to the tenants of a building or buildings located on a single tract of land undivided by
any publicly maintained highway, street or road at the time of installation of the central plant, and (B) which does not charge separately or by meter for electric energy used by any tenant except as part of a rental charge.
Any company excluded by this subdivision from the definition of “public utility” for the purposes of this chapter nevertheless shall, within 30 days following the issuance of a building permit, notify the State Corporation
Commission in writing of the ownership, capacity and location of such central plant, and it shall be subject, with regard to the quality of electric service furnished, to the provisions of Chapters 10 (§ 56-232 et seq.)
and 17 (§ 56-509 et seq.) and regulations thereunder and be deemed a public utility for such purposes, if such company furnishes such service to 100 or more lessees.

Any company, or affiliate thereof, making a first or direct sale, or ancillary transmission or delivery service, of natural gas to fewer than 35 commercial or industrial customers, which are not themselves “public utilities” as defined in this chapter,
or to certain public schools as indicated in this subdivision, for use solely by such purchasing customers at facilities which are not located in a territory for which a certificate to provide gas service has been issued
by the Commission under this chapter and which, at the time of the Commission’s receipt of the notice provided under § 56-265.4:5, are not located within any area, territory, or jurisdiction served by a municipal corporation
that provided gas distribution service as of January 1, 1992, provided that such company shall comply with the provisions of § 56-265.4:5. Direct sales or ancillary transmission or delivery services of natural gas to public
schools in the following localities may be made without regard to the number of schools involved and shall not count against the “fewer than 35” requirement in this subdivision: the Counties of Dickenson, Wise, Russell,
and Buchanan, and the City of Norton.

Any company which is not a public service corporation and which provides compressed natural gas service at retail for the public.

Any company selling landfill gas from a solid waste management facility permitted by the Department of Environmental Quality to a public utility certificated by the Commission to provide gas distribution service to the public in the area in which the
solid waste management facility is located. If such company submits to the public utility a written offer for sale of such gas and the public utility does not agree within 60 days to purchase such gas on mutually satisfactory
terms, then the company may sell such gas to (i) any facility owned and operated by the Commonwealth which is located within three miles of the solid waste management facility or (ii) any purchaser after such landfill gas
has been liquefied. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to the City of Lynchburg or Fairfax County.

Any authority created pursuant to the Virginia Water and Waste Authorities Act (§

15.2-5100

et seq.) making a sale or ancillary transmission or delivery service of landfill gas to a commercial or industrial customer from a solid waste management facility permitted by the Department of Environmental
Quality and operated by that same authority, if such an authority limits off-premises sale, transmission or delivery service of landfill gas to no more than one purchaser. The authority may contract with other persons for
the construction and operation of facilities necessary or convenient to the sale, transmission or delivery of landfill gas, and no such person shall be deemed a public utility solely by reason of its construction or operation
of such facilities. If the purchaser of the landfill gas is located within the certificated service territory of a natural gas public utility, the public utility may file for Commission approval a proposed tariff to reflect
any anticipated or known changes in service to the purchaser as a result of the use of landfill gas. No such tariff shall impose on the purchaser of the landfill gas terms less favorable than similarly situated customers
with alternative fuel capabilities; provided, however, that such tariff may impose such requirements as are reasonably calculated to recover the cost of such service and to protect and ensure the safety and integrity of
the public utility’s facilities.

A company selling or delivering only landfill gas, electricity generated from only landfill gas, or both, that is derived from a solid waste management facility permitted by the Department of Environmental Quality and sold or delivered from any such facility
to not more than three commercial or industrial purchasers or to a natural gas or electric public utility, municipal corporation or county as authorized by this section. If a purchaser of the landfill gas is located within
the certificated service territory of a natural gas public utility or within an area in which a municipal corporation provides gas distribution service and the landfill gas is to be used in facilities constructed after
January 1, 2000, such company shall submit to such public utility or municipal corporation a written offer for sale of that gas prior to offering the gas for sale or delivery to a commercial or industrial purchaser. If
the public utility or municipal corporation does not agree within 60 days following the date of the offer to purchase such landfill gas on mutually satisfactory terms, then the company shall be authorized to sell such landfill
gas, electricity, or both, to the commercial or industrial purchaser, utility, municipal corporation, or county. Such public utility may file for Commission approval a proposed tariff to reflect any anticipated or known
changes in service to the purchaser as a result of the purchaser’s use of the landfill gas. No such tariff shall impose on such purchaser of the landfill gas terms less favorable than those imposed on similarly situated
customers with alternative fuel capabilities; provided, however, that such tariff may impose such requirements as are reasonably calculated to recover any cost of such service and to protect and ensure the safety and integrity
of the public utility’s facilities.

A company that is not organized as a public service company pursuant to subsection D of §

13.1-620

and that sells and delivers propane air only to one or more public utilities. Any company excluded by this subdivision from the definition of “public utility” for the purposes of this chapter nevertheless
shall be subject to the Commission’s jurisdiction relating to gas pipeline safety and enforcement.

A farm or aggregation of farms that owns and operates facilities within the Commonwealth for the generation of electric energy from waste-to-energy technology. As used in this subdivision, (i) “farm” means any person that obtains at least 51 percent of
its annual gross income from agricultural operations and produces the agricultural waste used as feedstock for the waste-to-energy technology, (ii) “agricultural waste” means biomass waste materials capable of decomposition
that are produced from the raising of plants and animals during agricultural operations, including animal manures, bedding, plant stalks, hulls, and vegetable matter, and (iii) “waste-to-energy technology” means any technology,
including a methane digester, that converts agricultural waste into gas, steam, or heat that is used to generate electricity on-site.

A company, other than an entity organized as a public service company, that provides non-utility gas service as provided in § 56-265.4:6.

A company, other than an entity organized as a public service company, that provides storage of electric energy that is not for sale to the public.

“Commission” means the State Corporation Commission.

“Geothermal resources” means those resources as defined in §

45.2-2000

.

History.
1950, p. 599; 1954, c. 354; 1970, c. 265; 1981, c. 506; 1988, c. 440; 1990, c. 488; 1991, c. 263; 1992, c. 476; 1994, cc. 652, 852; 1995, c. 643; 1997, cc. 105, 148; 1999, c. 768; 2000, cc. 528, 543; 2002, cc. 479, 489;
2004, cc. 748, 1028; 2005, c. 22; 2006, c. 411; 2007, c. 813; 2009, cc. 746, 794; 2018, c. 296; 2020, c. 1190; 2022, cc. 728, 759.

The numbers of §§ 56-265.1 through 56-265.9
(not including § 56-265.4:1) were assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 1950 act having assigned no numbers.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 813, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the powers of any locality with respect to any ordinance, resolution or bylaw validly adopted and not repealed or rescinded prior to July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 20 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to any applications pending with the State Corporation Commission regarding new underground facilities or offshore wind facilities on or after January 1, 2018.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 24 provides: “That this act shall be known as the Grid Transformation and Security Act.”

Effective October 1, 2021, “§

45.2-2000

” was substituted for “§ 45.1-179.2” to conform to the recodification of Title 45.1 by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 1994 amendments.

The 1994 amendment by c. 652, inserted “storage” in the introductory paragraph of subdivision (b).

The 1994 amendment by c. 852 added “Except as otherwise provided in § 56-265.3:1” at the beginning of subdivision (b)(1).

The 1995 amendment
added subdivision (b)(6).

The 1997 amendments.

The 1997 amendments by cc. 105 and 148 are identical, and substituted “thirty-five commercial or industrial customers” for “ten commercial or industrial customers” near the beginning of subdivision (b)(4).

The 1999 amendment
added subdivision (b)(7).

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 528 and 543 are identical, and added subdivision (b)(8).

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 479 and 489 are identical, and inserted “unless such municipal corporation or county has obtained a certificate pursuant to § 56-265.4:4” at the end of subdivision (a).

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 748 substituted “50” for “fifty” in subdivision (b)(1); substituted “30” for “thirty” in subdivision (b)(3); in subdivision (b)(4), substituted “35” for “thirty-five,” inserted “or to certain public schools as indicated in this
subdivision,” and added the last sentence; and substituted “60” for “sixty” in subdivisions (b)(6) and (b)(8).

The 2004 amendment by c. 1028 inserted “a limited liability company” in paragraph (a); substituted “50” for “fifty” and “10” for “ten” in subdivision (b)(1); substituted “30” for “thirty” in subdivision (b)(3); substituted “35” for “thirty-five” in subdivision
(b)(1); and substituted “60” for “sixty” in subdivisions (b)(6) and (b)(8).

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 22, substituted “not more than three commercial or industrial purchasers” for “not more than one commercial or industrial purchaser” in the first sentence of subdivision (8) and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 411 added subdivision (b) (9).

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 813 substituted “the City of Lynchburg or Fairfax County” for “any city with a population of at least 64,000 but no more than 69,000 or any county with a population of at least 500,000” in subdivision (b)(6).

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 746 added subdivision (b)(10).

The 2009 amendment by c. 794, effective April 8, 2009, added subdivision (b)(10), which was subsequently renumbered as subdivision (b)(11) at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 296, in subsection (b), divided the first sentence into the first and last sentences, inserted “storage” in the first sentence, and added the second sentence, and substituted “does not include” for “shall not include” in the last
sentence; added subdivision (b)(12); and made stylistic changes. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1190, in subdivision (b), deleted “storage” following “generation, transmission” in the first sentence and substituted “A ‘public utility’ may own” for “As used in this definition” and inserted “that” in the second sentence; in
subdivision (b) (10), deleted “but not limited to” preceding “a methane digester” in the last sentence in clause (iii) and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by cc. 728 and 759 are identical, and substituted “natural gas, or, if produced, stored, transmitted, or distributed by a natural gas utility as defined in § 56-265.4:6, supplemental or substitute forms of gas sources as defined in
§ 56-248.1, or geothermal resources” for “natural or manufactured gas or geothermal resources” in subsection (b); deleted “or manufactured” following “natural” in subdivision (b)(4); and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For article entitled “Regulation of Electric Utilities by the State Corporation Commission,” see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 589 (1973).

For survey of Virginia law on municipal corporations for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1788 (1975).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
7A M.J. Eminent Domain, § 11; 13B M.J. Municipal Corporations, § 49; 15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, § 18.

§ 56-265.2.
Certificate of convenience and necessity required for acquisition, etc., of new facilities.

Subject to the provisions of subdivision 2, it shall be unlawful for any public utility to construct, enlarge or acquire, by lease or otherwise, any facilities for use in public utility service, except ordinary extensions or improvements in the usual
course of business, without first having obtained a certificate from the Commission that the public convenience and necessity require the exercise of such right or privilege. Any certificate required by this section shall
be issued by the Commission only after opportunity for a hearing and after due notice to interested parties. The certificate for overhead electrical transmission lines of 138 kilovolts or more shall be issued by the Commission
only after compliance with the provisions of § 56-46.1. A. 1. Subject to the provisions of subdivision 2, it shall be unlawful for any public utility to construct, enlarge or acquire, by lease or otherwise, any facilities
for use in public utility service, except ordinary extensions or improvements in the usual course of business, without first having obtained a certificate from the Commission that the public convenience and necessity require
the exercise of such right or privilege. Any certificate required by this section shall be issued by the Commission only after opportunity for a hearing and after due notice to interested parties. The certificate for overhead
electrical transmission lines of 138 kilovolts or more shall be issued by the Commission only after compliance with the provisions of § 56-46.1.

For construction of any transmission line of 138 kilovolts and associated facilities, a public utility shall either (i) obtain a certificate pursuant to subdivision 1 or (ii) obtain approval pursuant to the requirements of (a) §

15.2-2232

and (b) any applicable local zoning ordinances by the locality or localities in which the transmission line will be located. Issuance by the Commission of a certificate pursuant to subdivision 1 approving
construction of a 138 kilovolt transmission line and any associated facilities shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of §

15.2-2232

and all local zoning ordinances with respect to the transmission line and its associated facilities. For purposes of this subdivision, “associated facilities” include any station, substation, transition
station, and switchyard facilities to be constructed outside of any county operating under the county executive form of government that is located in Planning District 8 in association with a 138 kilovolt transmission line.

In exercising its authority under this section, the Commission, notwithstanding the provisions of § 56-265.4, may permit the construction and operation of electrical generating facilities, which shall not be included in the rate base of any regulated
utility whose rates are established pursuant to Chapter 10 (§ 56-232 et seq.), upon a finding that such generating facility and associated facilities including transmission lines and equipment (i) will have no material adverse
effect upon the rates paid by customers of any regulated public utility in the Commonwealth; (ii) will have no material adverse effect upon reliability of electric service provided by any such regulated public utility; and (iii)
are not otherwise contrary to the public interest. In review of its petition for a certificate to construct and operate a generating facility described in this subsection, the Commission shall give consideration to the effect of
the facility and associated facilities, including transmission lines and equipment, on the environment and establish such conditions as may be desirable or necessary to minimize adverse environmental impact as provided in § 56-46.1.
Facilities authorized by a certificate issued pursuant to this subsection may be exempted by the Commission from the provisions of Chapter 10 (§ 56-232 et seq.).

A map showing the location of any proposed ordinary extension or improvement outside of the territory in which the public utility is lawfully authorized to operate shall be filed with the Commission, and prior notice of such ordinary extension shall be
given to the public utility or other entity authorized to provide the same utility service within said territory. Ordinary extensions outside the service territory of a public utility shall be undertaken only for use in providing
its public utility service and shall be constructed and operated so as not to interfere with the service or facilities of any public utility or other entity authorized to provide utility service within any other territory. If,
upon objection of the affected utility or entity filed within 30 days of the aforesaid notice and after investigation and opportunity for a hearing the Commission finds an ordinary extension would not comply with this section,
it may alter or amend the plan for such activity or prohibit its construction.

Whenever a certificate is required under this section for a pipeline for the transmission or distribution of natural or manufactured gas, the Commission may issue such a certificate only after compliance with the provisions of § 56-265.2:1. As used in
this section and § 56-265.2:1, “pipeline for the transmission or distribution of manufactured or natural gas” shall include the pipeline and any related facilities incidental or necessary to the operation of the pipeline.

This section shall be subject to the requirements of § 56-265.3, if any, and nothing herein shall be construed to supersede § 56-265.3.

History.
1950, p. 599; 1985, c. 282; 1995, cc. 311, 514; 1998, c. 92; 2012, cc. 54, 284; 2017, c. 728.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, c. 771, provides: “§ 1. That in order to promote solar energy through distributed generation, the State Corporation Commission shall exercise its existing authority to consider for approval, after notice to all affected parties and opportunity
for hearing, petitions filed by a utility to construct and operate distributed solar generation facilities and to offer special tariffs to facilitate customer-owned distributed solar generation as alternatives to net energy metering,
with an aggregate amount of rated generating capacity of up to 0.20 percent of each electric utility’s adjusted Virginia peak load for the calendar year 2010. Such petitions may be made during the period of July 1, 2011, through July
1, 2015, and the Commission, on its own motion, may extend this period an additional year for good cause. Each distributed solar generation installation approved pursuant to this section shall be considered to be part of a demonstration
program to assess benefits to the utility’s distribution system, including constrained or high load growth circuits, for a period of five years from the date each installation becomes operational. Thereafter each installation shall
cease to be part of a demonstration program and, in the case of a utility-owned installation, shall continue to operate as a utility-owned generating facility, and in the case of a customer-owned installation, shall continue to provide
power to the utility pursuant to the terms of the agreed upon tariff arrangement. Subject to review by the Commission, such utility-owned distributed solar generation facilities and tariffs for power generated from customer-owned distributed
solar installations shall be prioritized in areas identified by the utility as areas where localized solar generation would provide benefits to the utility’s distribution system, including constrained or high-growth areas. The Commission
shall approve such programs or distributed generation facilities if it determines that the programs or facilities, including those targeting constrained or high load growth areas, are reasonably designed to be in furtherance of the
public interest.

“§ 2. A utility participating in demonstration programs pursuant to § 1 of this act shall use reasonable efforts to ensure that at least four of the distributed solar installation sites included in the demonstration projects shall be in a community setting,
which shall include, but not be limited to, to the extent permitted by law, participation by local governments, schools, community associations, neighborhood associations, or nonprofit organizations. The capacity of each such community
installation shall not exceed 500 kilowatts.

“§ 3. When a utility proposes solar distributed generation resources as permitted in § 1 of this act comprised of multiple installations combined collectively, the Commission shall consider such projects as one small non-combustible renewable power generation
facility for purposes of project approval pursuant to §§ 10.1-1197.5, 10.1-1197.8, 56-265.2, 56-580 and 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia. A ‘small non-combustible renewable power generation facility’ is a small renewable energy project
that generates electricity from sunlight and may consist of one or more installations distributed on separate structures or facilities, whether such installations are treated each as a stand-alone small renewable energy project or
are combined and treated collectively as one small renewable energy project.

“§ 4. The Commission shall provide annual reports on any demonstration programs approved pursuant to this act to the Governor and the chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Commerce and Labor.”

The 1995 amendments.

The 1995 amendment by c. 311, in the first paragraph, inserted the A designation, deleted “within the territory in which it is lawfully authorized to operate” following “course of business” in the first sentence; and, in the second sentence, substituted
“Any” for “The”, inserted “required by this section”, and substituted “opportunity for a hearing” for “formal or informal hearing”; and added subsections B and C.

The 1995 amendment by c. 514, effective March 23, 1995, in the first paragraph, in the first sentence, inserted the A designation and deleted “within the territory in which it is lawfully authorized to operate” following “course of business”; in the second
sentence, substituted “Any” for “The”, inserted “required by this section”, and substituted “opportunity for a hearing” for “formal or informal hearing”; and added subsections B and D.

The 1998 amendment,
effective March 13, 1998, added present subsection B, and redesignated former subsections B through D as present subsections C through E, respectively.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 54 and 284 are identical, and designated the existing provisions of subsection A as subdivision 1 and added “Subject to the provisions of subdivision 2” at the beginning thereof, and substituted “138 kilovolts” for “150 kilovolts”
in the last sentence; added subdivision A 2; in subsection B, deleted “of this title” following “(§ 56-232 et seq.)” in the first sentence, and deleted “of Title 56” at the end of the last sentence; and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 728, in subdivision A 2, inserted “and associated facilities” following “138 kilovolts,” and added the last two sentences.

Law Review.

For article on siting electric power facilities, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 257 (1972).

For note on nuclear power plant control, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 738 (1976).

For article, “Siting Power Lines in Historic Areas of Virginia,” see 29 U. Rich. L. Rev. 381 (1995).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
6B M.J. Electricity, § 2; 7A M.J. Eminent Domain, § 11; 15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, §§ 18, 30; 20 M.J. Water Companies and Waterworks, § 2.

§ 56-265.2:1.
Approval by Commission required for construction of certain gas pipelines and related facilities; notice and hearing.

Whenever a certificate is required pursuant to § 56-265.2 for the construction of a pipeline for the transmission or distribution of manufactured or natural gas, the Commission shall consider the effect of the pipeline on the environment, public safety,
and economic development in the Commonwealth, and may establish such reasonably practical conditions as may be necessary to minimize any adverse environmental or public safety impact. In such proceedings, the Commission shall receive
and consider all reports by state agencies concerned with environmental protection; and, if requested by any county or municipality in which the pipeline is proposed to be constructed, local comprehensive plans that have been adopted
pursuant to Article 3 (§

15.2-2223

et seq.) of Chapter 22 of Title 15.2.

The Commission shall not approve construction of any such pipeline unless the public utility has provided 30 days’ advance public notice of the proposed pipeline by (i) publishing a notice in a newspaper or newspapers of general circulation in each of
the counties and municipalities through which the pipeline is proposed to be constructed, (ii) providing written notice to the governing body of each such county and municipality, (iii) causing to be sent a copy of the notice by
first class mail to all owners of property within the route of the proposed pipeline, as indicated on the map or sketch of the route filed with the Commission, which requirement shall be satisfied by mailing the notice to such
persons at such addresses as are indicated in the land books maintained by the commissioner of revenue, director of finance or treasurer of the county or municipality, and (iv) filing a copy of any plans, specifications, or maps
of the proposed pipeline with the Commission, which plans, specifications, or maps shall be made available for public inspection at the Commission’s business office, during normal business hours. Any notice required by this subsection
shall include a written description of the proposed route the line is to follow, a map or sketch of the route, and information regarding the time period during which persons may request a public hearing under subsection C of this
section.

If, within 45 days after publication and mailing of the notices required in subsection B of this section, any interested party requests a public hearing, the Commission shall, as soon as reasonably practicable after such request, hold such hearing or
hearings at such place as may be designated by the Commission. If written requests therefor are received from 20 or more interested parties, the Commission shall hold at least one hearing in the area that would be affected by construction
of the pipeline, for the purpose of receiving public comment on the proposal. If any hearing is to be held in the area affected, the Commission shall direct that a copy of the transcripts of any previous hearings held in the case
be made available for public inspection at a convenient location in the area for a reasonable time before such local hearing.

For the purposes of this section, “interested parties” means the governing bodies of any counties or municipalities through which the pipeline is to be constructed, and persons residing or owning property within one-half mile of such pipeline. For the
purposes of this section, “environment” or “environmental” shall be deemed to include in meaning “historic.”

If a significantly different route is determined more desirable after the giving of the notice required in subsection B of this section, the Commission shall cause notice of the new route or routes to be published and mailed in accordance with subsection
B of this section. The Commission shall thereafter comply with the provisions of this section to the full extent necessary to give interested parties in the newly affected areas the same protection afforded interested parties affected
by the route described in the original notice.

Approval of a pipeline pursuant to this section shall be deemed to satisfy and supersede the requirements of §

15.2-2232

and local zoning ordinances with respect to such pipeline and related facilities; however, the Commission shall not approve the construction of a natural gas compressor station in an area zoned exclusively for residential
use unless the public utility provides certification from the local governing body that the natural gas compressor station is consistent with the zoning ordinance. The certification required by this subsection shall be deemed to
have been waived unless the local governing body informs the Commission and the public utility of the natural gas compressor station’s compliance or noncompliance within 45 days of the public utility’s written request.

History.
1995, c. 311; 2001, c. 758; 2014, cc. 467, 507.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 758 substituted “Article 3 (§

15.2-2223

et seq.) of Chapter 22 of Title 15.2” for “Article 4 (§ 15.1-446.1 et seq.) of Chapter 11 of Title 15.1” in subsection A; in subsection B, added present clause (iii), and redesignated former clause (iii) as present clause
(iv), and added the last sentence; in subsection C, in the first sentence, substituted “forty-five days after publication and mailing of the notices” for “thirty days after publication of a notice as,” substituted “such hearing or
hearings” for “a hearing,” and added the second and third sentences; and inserted “and mailed” in the first sentence of subsection E.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 467 and 507 are nearly identical, and in subsection B, substituted “30” for “thirty”; in subsection C, substituted “45” for “forty-five”; and in subsection F, inserted “exclusively” and substituted “45” for “forty-five.” An
additional technical correction was made by c. 467.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Public hearing. —

No public hearing by the State Corporation Commission (SCC) was needed by a natural gas company; the statute only requires that a public hearing by the SCC precede construction of a natural gas pipeline when a certificate is required pursuant to § 56-265.2.Va.
Natural Gas, Inc. v. Sumner, 98 Va. Cir. 167, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 21 (Chesapeake Feb. 23, 2018).

§ 56-265.3.
Certificate to furnish public utility service; allotment of territory transfers, leases or amendments.

No public utility shall begin to furnish public utility service within the Commonwealth without first having obtained from the Commission a certificate of public convenience and necessity authorizing it to furnish such service. Any company engaged in
furnishing a public utility service in this Commonwealth as of July 1, 1950, shall, upon filing maps with the Commission within ninety days from such date, showing the territory now being served by it, be entitled to receive a
certificate of convenience and necessity authorizing it to begin to furnish such public utility service in such territory. Also, any company that is granted authority under the Public Utilities Securities Act, Chapter 3 (§ 56-55
et seq.) of this title to issue securities for the purpose of constructing or extending facilities described in the application for such authority, shall, if the application was filed with the State Corporation Commission before
February 1, 1950, have the same right to a certificate of convenience and necessity that it would have had if the facilities had been in operation and serving the public on February 1, 1950. Any company which was engaged in furnishing
a public utility service in this Commonwealth as of July 1, 1950, and which is now so engaged in providing the same kind of service, and which could have filed maps with the Commission in accordance with the requirements of this
section but failed to do so, may file such maps not later than January 1, 1974, showing the territory now being served by it, and be entitled to receive a certificate of convenience and necessity authorizing it to continue to furnish
the same kind of public utility service in such areas to the same extent as if it had filed maps as of July 1, 1950.

On initial application by any company, the Commission, after formal or informal hearing upon such notice to the public as the Commission may prescribe, may, by issuance of a certificate of convenience and necessity, allot territory for development of
public utility service by the applicant if the Commission finds such action in the public interest.

If the initial application provides for the furnishing of water or sewerage service within any political subdivision in which there has been created an authority for either or both of such purposes pursuant to Chapter 51 (§

15.2-5100

et seq.) of Title 15.2, the Commission shall not hold any hearing on such application or issue any certificate for the allotment of territory unless the application shall first have been approved by the governing
body of the political subdivision in which the territory is located. In any area where a water company was in existence and furnishing water prior to the formation of an authority to provide water, the Commission may hold a hearing
on an application and issue a certificate to the water company for that territory which was served prior to the creation of the authority whether or not the governing body of the political subdivision has approved the application.
In any area where a sewer company was in existence and furnishing sewer services prior to the formation of an authority to provide sewer services, the Commission may hold a hearing on an application and issue a certificate to the
sewer company for that territory which was served prior to the creation of the authority whether or not the governing body of the political subdivision has approved the application.

If the Commission finds it to be in the public interest, upon the application of a holder of a water or sewer certificate, such certificate may be transferred, leased or amended after such reasonable notice to the public and opportunity to be heard as
the Commission by order may prescribe. The Commission may authorize the transfer, lease, or amendment of the certificate subject to such restrictions as the Commission finds will promote the public interest.

The Commission is authorized to promulgate any rules necessary to implement this section.

History.
1950, c. 599; 1968, c. 720; 1973, c. 397; 1986, c. 521; 1988, c. 233.

Law Review.

For article on state constitutions and the environment, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 193 (1972).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
1A M.J. Administrative Law, § 18; 15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, §§ 20, 33; 20 M.J. Water Companies and Waterworks, § 2; 3B M.J. Carriers, § 104; 15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions,
§§ 2, 30.